basic-cs.aff
FLAG long
SFX XA   0  ích   sklep
SFX XA   íh ěhu  sníh
SFX XA   íh ěhem  sníh
SFX XA   íh ěhy  sníh
SFX XA   íh ěhů  sníh
SFX XA   íh ěhům  sníh
SFX XA   íh ězích  sníh
SFX XA   eď   dem   zeď
SFX XA   eď   dech   zeď
SFX XA   eď   dmi   zeď
SFX XA   dlec  lce   tkadlec
SFX XA   dlec  lci   tkadlec
SFX XA   dlec  lcovi   tkadlec
SFX XA   dlec  lče   tkadlec
SFX XA   dlec  lcem   tkadlec
SFX XA   dlec  lcové   tkadlec
SFX XA   dlec  lců   tkadlec
SFX XA   dlec  lcům   tkadlec
SFX XA   dlec  lcích   tkadlec
SFX XA   íh   ihu  líh
SFX XA   íh   ihem  líh
SFX XA   íh   ihy  líh
SFX XA   íh   ihů  líh
SFX XA   íh   ihům  líh
SFX XA   íh   izích  líh
SFX XA   íh   ihu  líh
SFX XA   vec  evce   švec
SFX XA   vec  evci   švec
SFX XA   vec  evcovi   švec
SFX XA   vec  evče   švec
SFX XA   vec  evcem   švec
SFX XA   vec  evcové   švec
SFX XA   vec  evců   švec
SFX XA   vec  evcům   švec
SFX XA   vec  evcích   švec
SFX XA   áně  aně/C1  sáně


SFX XB Y 7
SFX XB   en   ne       týden   
SFX XB   en   nu       týden   
SFX XB   en   nem       týden   
SFX XB   en   ny       týden   
SFX XB   en   nů       týden   
SFX XB   en   nům       týden   
SFX XB   en   nech       týden   

SFX XC Y 3
SFX XC   0   ám      a
SFX XC   0   ách     a
SFX XC   0   ami     a





SFX WA Y 58
SFX WA   ít  de/B1   jít
SFX WA   jít  šel/O1   jít
SFX WA   jít  chodit/A1 jít
SFX WA   t    de/B1  jet
SFX WA   tít  ci   chtít
SFX WA   tít  ceš   chtít
SFX WA   tít  ce   chtít
SFX WA   tít  cu   chtít
SFX WA   tít  cou   chtít
SFX WA   tít  ceme   chtít
SFX WA   tít  cete   chtít
SFX WA   ít  ějí   chtít
SFX WA   ít  ěj   chtít
SFX WA   ít  ějme   chtít
SFX WA   ít  ějte   chtít
SFX WA   ít    ám   mít
SFX WA   ít    áš   mít
SFX WA   ít    á   mít
SFX WA   ít    áme   mít
SFX WA   ít    áte   mít
SFX WA   ít    ají   mít
SFX WA   ít    ěj   mít
SFX WA   ít    ějme   mít
SFX WA   ít    ějte   mít
SFX WA   být    jsem   být
SFX WA   být    jsi   být
SFX WA   být    je   být
SFX WA   být    jsme   být
SFX WA   být    jste   být
SFX WA   být    jsou   být
SFX WA   ýt    udu   být
SFX WA   ýt    udeš   být
SFX WA   ýt    ude   být
SFX WA   ýt    udeme   být
SFX WA   ýt    udete   být
SFX WA   ýt    udou   být
SFX WA   ýt    uď   být
SFX WA   ýt    uďme   být
SFX WA   ýt    uďte   být
SFX WA   st   m   jíst
SFX WA   st   š   jíst
SFX WA   íst   í   jíst
SFX WA   st   me   jíst
SFX WA   st   te   jíst
SFX WA   íst   edí   jíst
SFX WA   íst   ez   jíst
SFX WA   íst   ezme   jíst
SFX WA   íst   ezte   jíst
SFX WA   jíst   sníst/WAWB  jíst
SFX WA   st  m   sníst
SFX WA   st  š   sníst
SFX WA   íst  í   sníst
SFX WA   st  me   sníst
SFX WA   st  te   sníst
SFX WA   íst  ědí   sníst
SFX WA   íst  ěz   sníst
SFX WA   íst  ězme   sníst
SFX WA   íst  ězte   sníst









SFX WB Y 45
SFX WB   jít  půjdu  jít 
SFX WB   jít  půjdeš  jít 
SFX WB   jít  půjde  jít 
SFX WB   jít  půjdeme  jít 
SFX WB   jít  půjdete  jít 
SFX WB   jít  půjdou  jít 
SFX WB   jít  pojď   jít
SFX WB   jít  pojďme jít
SFX WB   jít  pojďte jít
SFX WB   jet  pojedu jet
SFX WB   jet  pojedeš jet
SFX WB   jet  pojede jet
SFX WB   jet  pojedeme jet
SFX WB   jet  pojedete jet
SFX WB   jet  pojedou jet
SFX WB   jet  pojeďme jet
SFX WB   jet  pojeďte jet
SFX WB   t  ď    jet
SFX WB   t  ďme  jet
SFX WB   t  ďte  jet
SFX WB   ít  ěl  chtít
SFX WB   ít  ěla  chtít
SFX WB   ít  ělo  chtít
SFX WB   ít  těli  chtít
SFX WB   ít  ěly  chtít
SFX WB   ít  ěl  mít
SFX WB   ít  ěla  mít
SFX WB   ít  ělo  mít
SFX WB   ít  ěli  mít
SFX WB   ít  ěly  mít
SFX WB   ýt  yl   být
SFX WB   ýt  yla   být
SFX WB   ýt  ylo   být
SFX WB   ýt  yli   být
SFX WB   ýt  yly   být
SFX WB   íst edl   jíst
SFX WB   íst edla   jíst
SFX WB   íst edlo   jíst
SFX WB   íst edli   jíst
SFX WB   íst edly   jíst
SFX WB   íst ědl  sníst
SFX WB   íst ědlo  sníst
SFX WB   íst ědla sníst
SFX WB   íst ědli  sníst
SFX WB   íst ědly  sníst



SFX WF Y 61 
SFX WF já mě já
SFX WF já mne já
SFX WF já mně já
SFX WF já mnou já
SFX WF y ebe ty
SFX WF y obě ty
SFX WF y ebou ty
SFX WF on něj on
SFX WF on něho on
SFX WF on jej on
SFX WF on jeho on
SFX WF on něm on
SFX WF on ním on
SFX WF on jím on
SFX WF on ho on
SFX WF on němu on
SFX WF on jemu on
SFX WF on mu on
SFX WF ona ní ona
SFX WF ona jí ona
SFX WF ona ní ona
SFX WF ona ji ona
SFX WF ona ni ona
SFX WF ono něj ono
SFX WF ono něho ono
SFX WF ono jej ono
SFX WF ono jeho ono
SFX WF ono něm ono
SFX WF ono ním ono
SFX WF ono jím ono
SFX WF ono ho ono
SFX WF ono němu ono
SFX WF ono jemu ono
SFX WF ono mu ono
SFX WF ono jich ono
SFX WF ono jim ono
SFX WF ono nim ono
SFX WF ono je ono
SFX WF ono ně ono
SFX WF ono jimi ono
SFX WF ono nimi ono
SFX WF ona jich ona
SFX WF ona jim ona
SFX WF ona nim ona
SFX WF ona je ona
SFX WF ona ně ona
SFX WF ona jimi ona
SFX WF ona nimi ona
SFX WF on jich on
SFX WF on jim on
SFX WF on nim on
SFX WF on je on
SFX WF on ně on
SFX WF on jimi on
SFX WF on nimi on
SFX WF my nás  my
SFX WF my nám my
SFX WF my námi my
SFX WF y ás  vy
SFX WF y ám  vy
SFX WF y ámi vy








SFX WG Y 19 
SFX WG ůj ého   ůj
SFX WG ůj ojeho ůj
SFX WG ůj ému   ůj
SFX WG ůj ojemu ůj
SFX WG ůj ém    ůj
SFX WG ůj ojem  ůj
SFX WG ůj ým    ůj
SFX WG ůj oje   ůj
SFX WG ůj é     ůj
SFX WG ůj ou    ůj
SFX WG ůj é     ůj
SFX WG ůj ých   ůj
SFX WG ůj ým    ůj
SFX WG ůj ojich ůj
SFX WG ůj ojim  ůj
SFX WG ůj ojím  ůj
SFX WG ůj ojích ůj
SFX WG ůj ými   ůj
SFX WG ůj ojimi ůj









SFX WH Y 34
SFX WH 0  0/WI   en
SFX WH en oho/WI en
SFX WH en omu/WI en
SFX WH en om/WI  en
SFX WH en ím/WI  en
SFX WH 0  0/WI   a
SFX WH a  é/WI   a
SFX WH a u/WI   a
SFX WH a ou/WI  a
SFX WH 0  0/WI   o
SFX WH o oho/WI o
SFX WH o omu/WI o
SFX WH o om/WI  o
SFX WH o ím/WI  o
SFX WH en i/WI   en
SFX WH en ěch/WI en
SFX WH en ěm/WI  en
SFX WH en ěmi/WI en
SFX WH a y/WI   a
SFX WH a ěch/WI a
SFX WH a ěm/WI  a
SFX WH a ěmi/WI a
SFX WH o a/WI   o
SFX WH o ěch/WI o
SFX WH o ěm/WI  o
SFX WH o ěmi/WI o
SFX WH 0 0/WI ý
SFX WH ý ého/WI ý
SFX WH ý ému/WI ý
SFX WH ý ém/WI ý
SFX WH ý é/WI ý
SFX WH 0 ch/WI ý
SFX WH 0 m/WI ý
SFX WH 0 mi/WI ý

SFX WI Y 2
SFX WI 0 to  .
SFX WI 0 hle .

SFX WJ Y 12
SFX WJ do koho kdo
SFX WJ do komu kdo
SFX WJ do kom kdo
SFX WJ do kým kdo
SFX WJ co čeho co
SFX WJ co čemu co
SFX WJ co čem co
SFX WJ co čím co
SFX WJ c  čeho nic
SFX WJ c  čemu nic
SFX WJ c  čem nic
SFX WJ c  čím nic

SFX XD Y 7
SFX XD   0   ův/Y1      [^e][^aoi]  sticky
SFX XD   0   ův/Y1      e[^kco]  sticky      
SFX XD   ek  kův/Y1     ek  sticky      
SFX XD   ec  cův/Y1     ec  sticky      
SFX XD   a   ův/Y1      a   sticky     
SFX XD   o   ův/Y1      o   sticky     
SFX XD   o   ův/Y1      eo  sticky     
     

SFX XF Y 2
SFX XF   el  lův/Y1     el  sticky      
SFX XF   er  rův/Y1     er  sticky

SFX FN Y 46
SFX FN   en    noho en
SFX FN   en    nomu en
SFX FN   en    nom  en
SFX FN   en    ním  en
SFX FN   en    na   en
SFX FN   en    né   en
SFX FN   en    nu   en
SFX FN   en    nou  en
SFX FN   en    no   en
SFX FN   a     ě    dva   
SFX FN   a     ou   dva   
SFX FN   a     ěma  dva   
SFX FN   tři     tří    tři
SFX FN   ři      řem    ři
SFX FN   ři      řech   ři
SFX FN   ři      řemi   tři
SFX FN   čtyři   čtyřmi   čtyři
SFX FN   0      i      šest
SFX FN   0      i      pět
SFX FN   0      i      m
SFX FN   ět     íti    ět
SFX FN   et     íti    et
SFX FN   et     eti    et
SFX FN   0      i      náct
SFX FN   0      i      cet
SFX FN   0      i      sát
SFX FN   o      a      sto
SFX FN   o      u      sto
SFX FN   o      em     sto
SFX FN   to     et     sto
SFX FN   o      y      sto
SFX FN   o      ům     sto
SFX FN   o      ech    sto
SFX FN   tě     et     stě  
SFX FN   ě      ům     stě  
SFX FN   ě      ech    stě  
SFX FN   ě      y      stě  
SFX FN   0      e      íc
SFX FN   0      i      íc
SFX FN   0      em     íc
SFX FN   0      ů      íc
SFX FN   0      ům     íc
SFX FN   0      ích    íc
SFX FN   on     ón/H1  ion
