basic-cs.dic
ahmad/P1V1XD
allen/P1V1XD
anděl/P1D1I1XD
arnold/P1V1XD
bach/P1V1XD
bang/P1V1XD
barus/U1V1XD
beck/P1V1XD
berger/P1V1XD
biker/P1V1XD
blum/P1V1XD
bookmaker/P1I1XD
brabec/U1V1XD
brichta/P1V1XD
brückner/P1V1XD
butko/P1V1XD
být/I1WAWBN1
bělina/P1V1XD
carter/P1V1XD
chlapec/U1XD
chtít/WAWBN1
chudík/P1V1XD
cooper/P1V1XD
dalimil/P1V1XD
deml/P1V1XD
divadelník/P1I1XD
doležel/P1V1XD
drahoslav/P1V1XD
dubček/P1V1XD
dědek/P1I1V1XD
eger/P1V1XD
enge/P1V1XD
evan/P1V1XD
fanda/P1V1XD
ferrari/P1V1XD
flachbart/P1V1XD
francis/U1V1XD
frynta/P1V1XD
gajda/P1V1XD
genetik/P1I1V1XD
godard/P1V1XD
grepl/P1V1XD
gynekolog/P1V1XD
halbich/P1V1XD
harald/P1V1XD
havel/P1V1XF
havran/P1I1XD
hendrych/P1V1XD
hirš/U1V1XD
hoffmeister/P1V1XD
homola/P1V1XD
houslista/P1D1XD
hronek/P1V1XD
hurvínek/P1V1XD
händel/P1V1XDXF
höschl/P1V1XD
imrich/P1V1XD
irving/P1V1XD
james/U1V1XD
jareš/U1V1XD
jenda/P1V1XD
jiras/U1V1XD
jones/U1V1XD
juračka/P1V1XD
jíst/J1T1N1WAWB
jít/I1N1WAWB
kachel/P1V1XF
kadeřábek/P1V1XD
kanibal/P1V1XD
karel/P1V1XF
karlík/P1I1V1XD
keith/P1V1XD
klacek/Q1H1P1I1V1XD
klouček/P1I1XD
kněz/XAU1XD
kocman/P1V1XD
kolomazník/P1V1XD
konopásek/P1V1XD
korespondent/P1I1XD
koukal/P1V1XD
kozel/P1I1V1XF
košan/P1V1XD
krayzel/P1V1XDXF
kremel/P1V1XDXF
kremer/P1V1XD
kruliš/U1V1XD
kunz/P1V1XD
křovák/P1I1V1XD
lendl/P1V1XD
lobkowicz/U1V1XD
lány/H1D1Q1P1V1XD
man/P1V1XD
matouš/U1V1XD
mendel/P1V1XDXF
menzel/P1V1XDXF
menšík/P1V1XD
miloš/U1V1XD
moravan/P1D1I1XD
myslitel/U1D1XD
mít/I1N1WAWB
negr/P1I1XD
nohel/P1V1XD
odbojář/U1XD
orel/P1I1XF
orlík/P1I1XD
oř/U1XD
padouch/P1I1XD
pavel/P1V1XF
pavlata/P1V1XD
petrouš/U1V1XD
plameňák/P1I1XD
polster/P1V1XD
praotec/U1XD
prorektor/P1I1XD
pučelík/P1V1XD
pytel/P1V1XF
pštros/P1I1XD
reformátor/P1I1XD
reichel/P1V1XDXF
riedel/P1V1XDXF
ringel/P1V1XDXF
roden/P1V1XD
russel/P1V1XDXF
rusín/P1I1V1XD
saudek/P1V1XD
severočech/P1I1XD
simmel/P1V1XDXF
slavomil/P1V1XD
sourozenec/U1XD
spiegel/P1V1XDXF
startér/P1I1XD
strážmistr/P1I1XD
světoběžník/P1I1XD
sábel/P1V1XDXF
teoretik/P1I1V1XD
tramp/P1XD
třeštík/P1V1XD
uhel/P1V1XF
vališ/U1V1XD
velekněz/XAU1XD
veniger/P1V1XD
vlčák/P1I1XD
vrah/P1I1V1XD
vídeň/U1V1Z1XD
weigel/P1V1XDXF
werfel/P1V1XDXF
werich/P1V1XD
wiesel/P1V1XDXF
zastupitel/U1D1XD
znalec/U1XD
útočník/P1I1XD
číhal/P1V1XD
šikula/P1V1XD
špidla/P1V1XD
šustr/P1V1XD
žonglér/P1I1XD
člověk/XA
pračlověk/XA
opočlověk/XA
nadčlověk/XA
bůh/XA
polobůh/XA
ďábel/XA
arciďábel/XA
den/XA
půlden/XA
týden/XB
dítě/XA
pes/XA
maxipes/XA
kočkopes/XA
prasopes/XA
dcera/XA
díra/XA
vejce/XA
loď/XAZ1
paroloď/XAZ1
vítr/XA
protivítr/XA
kráva/XAZ1
tráva/XAZ1
dráha/XAZ1
rychlodráha/XAZ1
brána/XAZ1
jáma/XAZ1
sláma/XAZ1
blána/XAZ1
nitroblána/XAZ1
protiváha/XAZ1
nadváha/XAZ1
žába/XAZ1
bába/XAZ1
vrána/XAZ1  
rána/XAZ1  
žíla/XAZ1
síla/XAZ1
lípa/XAZ1
chvála/XAZ1
skála/XAZ1
kámen/XA
lomikámen/XA
práce/XA
méněpráce/XA
vícepráce/XA
jméno/M1R1XA
hnůj/XA
lůj/XA
hůl/XA
dům/XA
dvůr/XA
vůl/XA
sůl/XA
stůl/XA
důl/XA
velkodůl/XA
kůň/XA
pakůň/XA
lev/XA
mravkolev/XA
lest/XA
chléb/XA
mráz/XA
holomráz/XA
déšť/XA
hrách/XA
mzda/XAZ1
veš/XA
křest/XA
zeď/XA
plíce/XAZ1
lžíce/XAZ1
stařec/XA
sníh/XA   
jít/WAWBN1
jet/WAWBN1
najít/WAWBN1
přejít/WAWBN1
předejít/WAWBN1
přijít/WAWBN1
popojít/WAWBN1
pojít/WAWBN1
dojít/WAWBN1
zajít/WAWBN1
vyjít/WAWBN1
podejít/WAWBN1
nadejít/WAWBN1
obejít/WAWBN1
odejít/WAWBN1
zajít/WAWBN1
projít/WAWBN1
ujít/WAWBN1
sejít/WAWBN1
najet/WAWBN1
přejet/WAWBN1
předjet/WAWBN1
přijet/WAWBN1
popojet/WAWBN1
dojet/WAWBN1
zajet/WAWBN1
vyjet/WAWBN1
podjet/WAWBN1
nadjet/WAWBN1
objet/WAWBN1
odjet/WAWBN1
zajet/WAWBN1
projet/WAWBN1
ujet/WAWBN1
sjet/WAWBN1
tkadlec/XA  
líh/XA
leb/XA
švec/XA
sáně/XA
svůj/WG
nesvůj/WG
tvůj/WG
můj/WG
já/WF
ty/WF
on/WF
ona/WF
ono/WF
my/WF
vy/WF
ten/WH
ta/WH
to/WH
takový/WH
kdo/WJ
co/WJ
někdo/WJ
něco/WJ
nic/WJ
jeden/FN
dva/FN
tři/FN
čtyři/FN
pět/FN
šest/FN
sedm/FN
osm/FN
devět/FN
deset/FN
jedenáct/FN
dvanáct/FN
třináct/FN
čtrnáct/FN
patnáct/FN
šestnáct/FN
sedmnáct/FN
osmnáct/FN
devatenáct/FN
dvacet/FN
třicet/FN
čtyřicet/FN
padesát/FN
šedesát/FN
sedmdesát/FN
osmdesát/FN
devadesát/FN
sto/FN
tisíc/FN
milion/H1FN
bilion/H1FN
trilion/H1FN
kvadrilion/H1FN
kvintilion/H1FN
sextilion/H1FN
septilion/H1FN
oktilion/H1FN
nonilion/H1FN
decilion/H1FN
